Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4404
Vaccination for rabies; cost; payment.

The cost of rabies vaccination shall be borne by the owner of the domestic or hybrid animal.

Laws 1969, c. 445, § 4, p. 1486;

Laws 1987, LB 104, § 4;

Laws 2007, LB25, § 6.